Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Chapter 6 Abortions

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Fetal Rights—Why the Abortion “Albatross” Is a Bird of a Different Color: The Case for Fetal-Federalism,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 627 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

1 Am. Jur. 2d Abortion § 1 et seq.

Admissibility, in prosecution based on abortion, of evidence of commission of similar crimes by accused, 15 ALR2d 1080.

Necessity, to warrant conviction of abortion, that fetus be living at time of commission of acts, 16 ALR2d 949.

Pregnancy as element of abortion or homicide based thereon, 46 ALR2d 1393.

Availability of defense of entrapment where one accused of abortion denies participation in offense, 61 ALR2d 677.

Woman upon whom abortion is committed or attempted as accomplice for purposes of rule requiring corroboration of accomplice testimony, 34 ALR3d 858.

Right of action for injury to or death of woman who consented to illegal abortion, 36 ALR3d 630.

Homicide based on killing of unborn child, 40 ALR3d 444; 64 ALR5th 671.

Woman's right to have abortion without consent of, or against objection of, child's father, 62 ALR3d 1097.

Tort liability for wrongfully causing one to be born, 83 ALR3d 15, 74 ALR4th 798.

Validity of state statutes and regulations limiting or restricting public funding for abortions sought by indigent women, 20 ALR4th 1166.

Medical malpractice in performance of legal abortion, 69 ALR4th 875.

Liability for interference with physician-patient relationship, 87 ALR4th 845.

Parent's child support liability as affected by other parent's fraudulent misrepresentation regarding sterility or use of birth control, or refusal to abort pregnancy, 2 ALR5th 337.

Validity, construction, and application of statutes requiring parental notification of or consent to minor's abortion, 77 ALR5th 1.

Constitutional right of prisoners to abortion services and facilities—federal cases, 90 ALR Fed 683.

1 C.J.S. Abortion and Birth Control; Family Planning § 1 et seq.

§ 35-6-101.
Definitions.

As used in the act, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Abortion” means an act, procedure, device or prescription administered to or prescribed for a pregnant woman by any person with knowledge of the pregnancy, including the pregnant woman herself, with the intent of producing the premature expulsion, removal or termination of a human embryo or fetus, except that in cases in which the viability of the embryo or fetus is threatened by continuation of the pregnancy, early delivery after viability by commonly accepted obstetrical practices shall not be construed as an abortion;

“Accepted medical procedures” means procedures of the type and performed in a manner and in a facility which is equipped with surgical, anaesthetic, resuscitation and laboratory equipment sufficient to meet the standards of medical care which physicians engaged in the same or similar lines of work in the community would ordinarily exercise and devote to the benefit of their patients;

“Conception” means the fecundation of the ovum by the spermatozoa;

“Hospital” means those institutions licensed by the state department of health as hospitals;

“Physician” means any person licensed to practice medicine in this state;

“Pregnant” means that condition of a woman who has a human embryo or fetus within her as the result of conception;

“Viability” means that stage of human development when the embryo or fetus is able to live by natural or life-supportive systems outside the womb of the mother according to appropriate medical judgment;

“Woman” means any female person;

The singular where used herein includes the plural, the plural includes the singular, and the masculine includes the feminine or neuter, when consistent with the intent of this act and when necessary to effect its purpose;

“Minor” means a pregnant woman under the age of eighteen (18), but does not include any woman who:

Is legally married;

Is in active military service; or

Has lived apart from her parents or guardian, has been financially independent and has managed her own affairs for at least six (6) months prior to a proposed abortion.

“Parents” means both parents of a minor if they are both living, or one (1) parent of the minor if only one (1) is living or if the second parent cannot be located through a reasonably diligent effort;

“This act” means W.S.

35-6-101

through

35-6-119

.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 11, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-221.13; Laws 1989, ch. 247, § 2; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2017 ch. 187, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to licensing and operation of hospitals, health care facilities and health services, see §§

35-2-901

to

35-2-911

.

As to licensing of physicians, see §§

33-26-301

to

33-26-307

.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(xii), substituted “35-6-119” for “35-6-118”.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-6-102.
Abortion restrictions; exception.

An abortion shall not be performed after the embryo or fetus has reached viability except when necessary to preserve the woman from an imminent peril that substantially endangers her life or health, according to appropriate medical judgment. This subsection is repealed on the date that subsection (b) of this section becomes effective.

An abortion shall not be performed except when necessary to preserve the woman from a serious risk of death or of substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function, not including any psychological or emotional conditions, or the pregnancy is the result of incest as defined by W.S.

6-4-402

or sexual assault as defined by W.S.

6-2-301

. This subsection shall be effective five (5) days after the date that the governor, on advice of the attorney general, certifies to the secretary of state that the supreme court of the United States has overruled Roe v. Wade, 410 U.S. 113 (1973) in a manner that would authorize the enforcement of this subsection or has otherwise issued a final decision related to abortion that would authorize the enforcement of this subsection in accordance with that decision and without violating any conditions, rights or restrictions recognized by the supreme court.

For purposes of subsection (b) of this section the attorney general shall review any final decisions of the supreme court of the United States related to Roe v. Wade, 410 U.S. 113 (1973) or otherwise related to abortion to determine whether the enforcement of subsection (b) of this section would be fully authorized under that decision. The attorney general shall, within thirty (30) days of the date of the final decision of the supreme court, report the results of each review under this subsection to the joint judiciary interim committee and the governor who may, if applicable, certify the results of the review to the office of the secretary of state.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 11, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-221.14; 2022 ch. 88, § 1, effective March 15, 2022.

The 2022 amendment

added the (a) designation; added the last sentence in (a); and added (b) and (c).

Laws 2022, ch. 88, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 15, 2022.

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2022, ch. 88, § 2, provides, “(a) After receiving certification from the governor that W.S. 35-6-102(b) is effective as provided in that subsection, the secretary of state shall report that fact to the management council of the legislature, the joint judiciary interim committee and the Wyoming state board of medicine and shall immediately publish the effective date of W.S. 35-6-102(b) and 35-6-117(b) on the website of the secretary of state's office, which effective date shall be five (5) days after the date that the secretary of state received the certification. The publication under this section shall also provide that W.S. 35-6-102(a) and 35-6-117(a) are repealed on that date.

“(b) After receiving a report under subsection (a) of this section, the joint judiciary interim committee shall review the provisions of title 35, chapter 6 of the Wyoming statutes to determine if any additional revisions to the statutes are advisable and to develop any necessary legislation.”

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Fetal Equality?: The Equality State's Response to the Challenge of Protecting Unborn Children,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 193 (1997).

§ 35-6-103.
Viability not affected by abortion.

A physician who performs an abortion procedure employed pursuant to W.S.

35-6-102

shall not intentionally terminate the viability of the unborn infant prior to, during or following the procedure.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 11, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-221.15.

§ 35-6-104.
Means of treatment for viable abortion.

The commonly accepted means of care that would be rendered to any other infant born alive shall be employed in the treatment of any viable infant aborted alive. Any physician performing an abortion shall take medically appropriate and reasonable steps to preserve the life and health of an infant born alive.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 11, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-221.16; 2021 ch. 135, § 1, effective April 6, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the first sentence, added "that would be rendered to any other infant born alive," deleted "with any chance of survival" at the end; and added the second sentence.

§ 35-6-105.
Private institutions not required to perform abortions; no liability for refusal to perform abortion.

No private hospital, clinic, institution or other private facility in this state is required to admit any patient for the purpose of performing an abortion nor to allow the performance of an abortion therein. The private hospital, clinic, institution or any other private facility shall inform any prospective patient seeking an abortion of its policy not to participate in abortion procedures. No cause of action shall arise against any private hospital, clinic, institution or any other private facility for refusing to perform or allow an abortion.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 11, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-221.17.

§ 35-6-106.
Persons not required to perform abortion; no civil liability for refusal; sanctions or discrimination for refusal forbidden.

No person shall, in any way, be required to perform or participate in any abortion or in any act or thing which accomplishes or performs or assists in accomplishing or performing a human miscarriage, euthanasia or any other death of a human fetus or human embryo. The refusal of any person to do so is not a basis for civil liability to any person. No hospital, governing board or any other person, firm, association or group shall terminate the employment of, alter the position of, prevent or impair the practice or occupation of, or impose any other sanction or otherwise discriminate against any person who refuses to perform or participate in any abortion or in any act or thing which accomplishes, performs or assists in accomplishing or performing a human miscarriage, euthanasia or any other death of a human fetus or embryo.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 11, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-221.18.

§ 35-6-107.
Forms for reporting abortions.

The state office of vital records services shall establish an abortion reporting form which shall be used after May 27, 1977 for the reporting of every abortion performed or prescribed in this state. The form shall include the following items in addition to the information necessary to complete the form subject to subsection (b) of this section:

The age of the pregnant woman;

The type of procedure performed or prescribed;

Complications, if any;

A summary of the pregnant woman’s obstetrical history regarding previous pregnancies, abortions and live births;

The length and weight of the aborted fetus or embryo, when measurable or the gestational age of the aborted fetus or embryo in completed weeks at the time of abortion;

Type of facility where the abortion is performed (i.e., hospital, clinic, physician’s office, or other).

In addition to the requirements provided in subsection (a) of this section, the form shall not contain the name or the address of the pregnant woman or any other common identifiers including a social security number, driver’s license number or any other information or identifier that would tend to disclose the identity of the pregnant woman or any other participant other than the reporting physician.

The form shall be completed by the attending physician and submitted to the state health officer as defined in W.S. 9-2-103(e) within twenty (20) days after the abortion is performed. A physician who fails to submit a form under this section within one hundred ten (110) days after an abortion is performed shall be reported to the board of medicine by the state health officer. The board of medicine shall investigate the matter and may take disciplinary action under W.S. 33-26-402(a)(x).

Termination of a pregnancy by natural miscarriage or as a treatment consequence of a natural miscarriage shall not be reported as an abortion pursuant to this section, provided that the miscarriage was not induced with the intent of terminating the pregnancy. An alleged miscarriage that was induced with the intent of terminating a pregnancy shall be reported as an abortion pursuant to this section.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 11, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-221.19; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2019 ch. 179, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), substituted “W.S. 9-2-103(e)” for “W.S. 9-2-101(f).”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (a), substituted “the information necessary” for “such other information as may be necessary” and “form subject to subsection (b) of this section” for “form, but in no case shall information be required that would tend to disclose the identity of any individual participating in an abortion,” in (a)(v), added “or the gestational age of the aborted fetus or embryo in completed weeks at the time of abortion”; added (b); redesignated former (b) as (c), substituted “submitted” for “sent,” and added the last two sentences; and added (d).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 35-6-108.
Compilations of abortions; matter of record; exception.

The state office of vital records services shall prepare and keep on file for seven (7) years compilations of the information submitted on the abortion reporting forms. The compilations shall be available as provided in this section. The state health officer, in order to maintain and keep such compilations current, shall file with the reports any new or amended information. The information submitted under W.S.

35-6-107

and compiled under this section, except the report required under subsection (c) of this section, shall not be stored in any computer.

An abortion reporting form received under W.S.

35-6-107

shall be maintained in strict confidence by the state office of vital records services, shall not be a public record and shall not be made available except to the attorney general or a district attorney with appropriate jurisdiction pursuant to a criminal investigation or to the state board of medicine pursuant to an investigation. The attorney general or a district attorney receiving an abortion form pursuant to this subsection shall keep the form and information from the form confidential except as may be required by law for a criminal prosecution. The state board of medicine receiving an abortion form pursuant to this subsection shall keep the form and information from the form confidential except as may be required by law to determine or enforce an action regarding licensure.

Not later than June 30 of each year the office of vital records services shall issue a public report providing summary statistics for the previous calendar year compiled from all of the abortion reporting forms from that year submitted in accordance with this section for each of the items listed in W.S.

35-6-107

. The report shall also include the statistics for all previous calendar years during which this subsection was in effect, adjusted to reflect any additional information from late or corrected reports. The office shall ensure that no information included in the public reports could reasonably lead to the identification of any woman upon whom an abortion was performed, induced or attempted. The report shall be transmitted to the United States centers for disease control and prevention for the national abortion surveillance report.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 11, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-221.20; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2019 ch. 179, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, designated former undesignated paragraph as present (a), deleted "after May 27, 1977," substituted "available as provided in this section" for "available only to a local, state or national public health official or a physician upon his written request," and added "except the report required under subsection (c) of this section"; and added (b) and (c).

Cross references. —

As to vital records generally, see §§

35-1-401

to

35-1-431

.

§ 35-6-109.
Rules and regulations for disposal of bodies and parts thereof.

The state department of health may prescribe rules and regulations for the disposal of the bodies, tissues, organs and parts thereof of an unborn child, human fetus or human embryo which has been aborted.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 11, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-221.21; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

§ 35-6-110.
Penalty for violation of W.S. 35-6-102, 35-6-103 or 35-6-104.

Any physician or other person who violates any provision of W.S.

35-6-102

,

35-6-103

or

35-6-104

is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment in the penitentiary for not more than fourteen (14) years.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 11, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-221.22.

§ 35-6-111.
Penalty for person other than physician to perform abortion.

Any person other than a licensed physician who performs an abortion is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment in the penitentiary for not less than one (1) year nor more than fourteen (14) years.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 11, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-221.23.

§ 35-6-112.
Penalty to use means other than commonly accepted medical procedures.

Any person who performs or prescribes an abortion by using anything other than accepted medical procedures is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment in the penitentiary for not more than fourteen (14) years.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 11, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-221.24.

§ 35-6-113.
Penalty for violating W.S. 35-6-106.

Any person, firm, corporation, group or association who violates W.S.

35-6-106

is guilty of an offense punishable by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00).

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 11, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-221.25.

§ 35-6-114.
Right to damages for discriminatory employment practices for refusal to perform abortion.

Any person or persons injured by any action prohibited in W.S.

35-6-106

may by civil action obtain injunctive relief or damages.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 11, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-221.26.

Cross references. —

As to proceedings for injunctions, see Rule 65, W.R.C.P.

§ 35-6-115.
Penalty for giving away an aborted child for experimentation; exemptions.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, whoever sells, transfers, distributes or gives away any aborted child or any tissue or cells from an aborted child for any form of experimentation is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) and by imprisonment in the penitentiary for not less than one (1) year nor more than fourteen (14) years. Any person consenting, aiding or abetting such sale, transfer, distribution or other unlawful disposition of an aborted child or any tissue or cells from an aborted child is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) and by imprisonment in the penitentiary for not less than one (1) year nor more than fourteen (14) years or both, and shall also be subject to prosecution for violation of any other criminal statute.

Subsection (a) of this section shall not be construed to apply to:

Any legal organ or tissue donations made by a parent;

A child or any tissues or cells from a miscarriage or produced by any medical procedure following a miscarriage, or any other medical condition which is not an abortion;

The use or transfer of tissue or cells from an aborted child, embryo or fetus for medical examination and testing to:

Identify, confirm or deny any medical condition which lead to or influenced the decision to terminate the pregnancy;

Obtain information relating to future medical treatment or counseling of parents, siblings or other blood relatives of the aborted child, embryo or fetus; or

Comply with hospital quality control regulations.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 11, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-221.27; 2017 ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added the designation (a), in the first sentence added “(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section” to
the beginning, deleted “live or viable” following “gives away any” and, in the second sentence, added “or any tissue or cells from an aborted child”; and added (b).

Severability. —

Section 3, ch. 11, Laws 1977, reads: “If any provisions of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”

§ 35-6-116.
Advertising drug or nostrum for procuring abortion or miscarriage.

Whoever prints or publishes any advertisement of any drug or nostrum with intent to obtain utilization of such drug or nostrum for procuring abortion or miscarriage; or sells or gives away, or keeps for sale or gratuitous distribution, any newspaper, circular, pamphlet, or book containing such advertisement, or any account or description, of such drug or nostrum with intent to obtain utilization of such drugs or nostrum to procure abortion or miscarriage, shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00), to which may be added imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 73, § 83; R.S. 1899, § 5063; C.S. 1910, § 5913; C.S. 1920, § 7202; R.S. 1931, § 32-520; C.S. 1945, § 9-515; W.S. 1951, § 6-105; W.S. 1957, § 6-133; Laws 1969, ch. 32, § 9; W.S. 1977, §

6-5-302

; Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 1.

Invalidity of section asserted by improper party. —

Where plaintiff is not a physician, nor does she assert that any of the people she represents are physicians, and there is no contention she is a publisher, seller or distributor of medicine or nostrums, or that she has ever sought such medicines or nostrums, she was not the proper party to assert the invalidity of this section. Doe v. Burk, 513 P.2d 643,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1973).

Law reviews. —

For note, “The Constitutionality of Anti-Birth Control Legislation,” see 7 Wyo. L.J. 138.

§ 35-6-117.
Use of appropriated funds for abortion prohibited; exceptions.

No funds appropriated by the legislature of the state of Wyoming shall be used to pay for abortions except when the pregnancy is the result of incest as defined by W.S.

6-4-402

or sexual assault as defined by W.S.

6-2-301

if the assault is reported to a law enforcement agency within five (5) days after the assault or within five (5) days after the time the victim is capable of reporting the assault, or when the life of the mother would be endangered if the unborn child was carried to full term. This subsection is repealed on the date that subsection (b) of this section becomes effective.

No funds appropriated by the legislature of the state of Wyoming shall be used to pay for abortions except when necessary to preserve the woman from a serious risk of death or of substantial and irreversible physical impairment of a major bodily function, not including any psychological or emotional conditions, or the pregnancy is the result of incest as defined by W.S.

6-4-402

or sexual assault as defined by W.S.

6-2-301

. This subsection is effective on the same date that W.S. 35-6-102(b) is effective.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 28, § 1; 2022 ch. 88, § 1, effective March 15, 2022.

The 2022 amendment

added the (a) designation; added the last sentence in (a); and added (b).

Laws 2022, ch. 88, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 15, 2022.

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2022, ch. 88, § 2, provides, “(a) After receiving certification from the governor that W.S. 35-6-102(b) is effective as provided in that subsection, the secretary of state shall report that fact to the management council of the legislature, the joint judiciary interim committee and the Wyoming state board of medicine and shall immediately publish the effective date of W.S. 35-6-102(b) and 35-6-117(b) on the website of the secretary of state's office, which effective date shall be five (5) days after the date that the secretary of state received the certification. The publication under this section shall also provide that W.S. 35-6-102(a) and 35-6-117(a) are repealed on that date.

“(b) After receiving a report under subsection (a) of this section, the joint judiciary interim committee shall review the provisions of title 35, chapter 6 of the Wyoming statutes to determine if any additional revisions to the statutes are advisable and to develop any necessary legislation.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of state statutes and regulations limiting or restricting public funding for abortions sought by indigent women, 118 ALR 5th 463.

§ 35-6-118.
Procedure governing abortion performed upon minor.

An abortion shall not be performed upon a minor unless at least one (1) of the minor’s parents or her guardian are notified in writing at least forty-eight (48) hours before the abortion, and the attending physician has obtained the written consent of the minor and at least one (1) parent or guardian of the minor, unless:

The minor, in a closed hearing, is granted the right to self-consent to an abortion by court order pursuant to subparagraph (b)(v)(B) of this section and the attending physician receives a certified copy of the court order and the written consent of the minor; or

The abortion is authorized by court order pursuant to subparagraph (b)(v)(C) of this section and the attending physician receives a certified copy of the court order.

A juvenile court of jurisdiction may grant the right of a minor to self-consent to an abortion or may authorize an abortion upon a minor in accordance with the following procedure:

The minor shall apply to the juvenile court for assistance either in person or through an adult of the minor’s choice. The court shall assist the minor in preparing the petition and notices required under this subsection;

Notwithstanding W.S.

14-6-212

, the minor or an adult of the minor’s choice shall file a petition with the court, signed by the minor and setting forth:

The initials of the minor and the minor’s date of birth;

The names and addresses, if known, of the minor’s parents, guardian, custodian or, if the minor’s parents are deceased and a guardian or custodian has not been appointed, any other person standing in loco parentis of the minor;

That the minor has been informed by her treating physician of the risks and consequences of an abortion;

That the minor is mature and wishes to have an abortion; and

Facts indicating why an abortion is in the best interest of the minor.

The court may appoint a guardian ad litem of the minor and may appoint legal counsel for the minor;

Within five (5) days after the petition is filed under paragraph (ii) of this subsection, a hearing on the merits of the petition shall be held on the record. Any appointed counsel shall be appointed and notified by the court at least forty-eight (48) hours before the time set for hearing. At the hearing, the court shall hear evidence relating to:

The maturity and understanding of the minor;

The nature of the abortion, risks and consequences of the abortion, and alternatives to the abortion; and

Whether an abortion is in the best interest of the minor.

In its order, which shall be issued within twenty-four (24) hours of the hearing, the court shall enter findings of fact and conclusions of law, order the record of the hearing sealed and shall:

Deny the petition, setting forth the grounds on which the petition is denied;

Grant the minor the right to self-consent to the abortion based upon a finding by clear and convincing evidence that the minor is sufficiently mature and adequately informed to make her own decision, in consultation with her physician, independently of the wishes of her parents or guardian; or

Authorize the abortion based upon a finding by clear and convincing evidence that the abortion is in the best interest of the minor.

Any order entered pursuant to paragraph (v) of this subsection may be appealed by a party to the supreme court in accordance with the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure. Notwithstanding W.S.

14-6-233

, the supreme court shall by rule provide for expedited appellate review of appeals under this paragraph.

The provisions of this section shall not apply in an emergency medical situation when, to a reasonable degree of medical probability, the attending physician determines that an abortion is necessary to preserve the minor from an imminent peril that substantially endangers her life, and so certifies in the minor’s medical record.

The written notifications required under this section shall be delivered:

Personally by the minor, attending physician or an agent; or

By certified mail addressed to the parent at the usual place of abode of the parent with return receipt requested and restricted delivery to the addressee.

No parent, guardian or spouse shall require a minor to submit to an abortion against her wishes.

Any physician or other person who knowingly performs an abortion on a minor in violation of W.S.

35-6-118

is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 247, § 1.

§ 35-6-119.
Information provided to patient; exceptions; penalty.

Except in the case of a medical emergency, the physician performing the abortion on the patient, the referring physician or a person designated by either physician shall inform the patient of the opportunity to view an active ultrasound of the unborn child and hear the heartbeat of the unborn child if the heartbeat is audible. The active ultrasound image and auscultation of fetal heart tone shall be of a quality consistent with standard medical practice in the community.

This section shall not apply to a procedure performed with the intent to:

Save the life of the patient;

Ameliorate a serious risk of causing the patient substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function;

Preserve the health of the unborn child;

Remove a dead unborn child; or

Remove an ectopic pregnancy.

History.

2017 ch. 187, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 187, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.